Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1088
Receivers; extent of representation.

Every receiver shall be considered the receiver of any party to the suit, and no others.

R.S.1867, Code § 273, p. 439;

R.S.1913, § 7817;

C.S.1922, § 8761;

C.S.1929, § 20-1088;

R.S.1943, § 25-1088.

Court has no power to appoint even temporary receiver for solvent corporation without notice to stockholders, where officers, who were the only parties notified, were charged with misuse of corporate powers. Furrer v. Nebraska Bldg. & Inv. Co., 108 Neb. 698, 189 N.W. 359 (1922).

Parties are not liable for receiver's wrongful acts. City Savings Bank v. Carlon, 87 Neb. 266, 127 N.W. 161 (1910).

Bond holders who are not parties to suit are not bound by acts of receiver. Smiley v. Sioux Beet Syrup Co., 71 Neb. 581, 99 N.W. 263 (1904).